District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-771

Private facilities — License required.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 20, 1908, 35 Stat. 64, ch. 148, § 1
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 19(a), 29 DCR 5297
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(i), 30 DCR 5778

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-101.
1973 Ed., § 32-301.